Connecticut, session 2026, HB05544.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 9-164 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
1, 2027):
(a) (1) (A) On and after January 1, [2022] 2027, and notwithstanding
any contrary provision of law, there shall be held in each municipality,
biennially, a municipal election either (i) on the Tuesday after the first
Monday of November of the odd-numbered years, except that such
municipal election may be held on the first Monday of May of the odd-
numbered years if the legislative body of such municipality so
determines by a three-fourths vote, or (ii) in conjunction with the state
election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the
even-numbered years if the legislative body of such municipality so
determines by a majority vote.
sHB5544 / File No. 550 1

sHB5544 File No. 550
(B) In any municipality where the legislative body determines to hold
its municipal election on the first Monday of May of the odd-numbered
years in accordance with the provisions of subparagraph (A)(i) of this
subdivision, such legislative body may subsequently determine by a
majority vote to hold such municipal election on the Tuesday after the
first Monday of November of the odd-numbered years or in conjunction
with the state election on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in
November of the even-numbered years.
(2) In any municipality where the term of any incumbent municipal
elected official would expire prior to the next regular election held
under the provisions of this section, the term of such official shall be
extended to conform to the beginning of the succeeding term under
section 9-187a, as amended by this act.
Sec. 2. Section 9-164c of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
On and after January 1, [2022] 2027, (1) any municipality may change
the date of its municipal election in accordance with the provisions of
section 9-164, as amended by this act, (2) in any municipality that
changes from the November municipal election date in the odd-
numbered years specified in said section to the May municipal election
date in the odd-numbered years specified in said section, the terms of
incumbent municipal elected officials shall be diminished to conform to
such change, [but for a period of not more than nine months, and] (3) in
any municipality that changes from the May municipal election date in
the odd-numbered years specified in said section to the November
municipal election date in the odd-numbered years specified in said
section, the terms of incumbent municipal elected officials shall be
extended to conform to such change, [but for a period of not more than
nine months] (4) in any municipality that changes from the November
municipal election date in the odd-numbered years specified in said
section to the November municipal election date in the even-numbered
years specified in said section, the terms of incumbent municipal elected
officials shall be diminished to conform to such change, and (5) in any
sHB5544 / File No. 550 2

sHB5544 File No. 550
municipality that changes from the May municipal election date in the
odd-numbered years specified in said section to the November
municipal election date in the even-numbered years specified in said
section, the terms of incumbent municipal elected officials shall be
diminished to conform to such change.
Sec. 3. Section 9-187a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
Except as provided in sections 9-164b to 9-164f, inclusive, as amended
by this act, the term of each elected municipal official shall begin within
seventy days after the municipal election at which such official is
elected, on the day within such period prescribed by special act or
charter provision, or, in the absence of such special act or charter
provision, on the day within such period as is prescribed by action of
the legislative body of such municipality, provided (1) in each
municipality which holds its municipal election on the [first Monday of]
May date in the odd-numbered years specified in section 9-164, as
amended by this act, in the absence of such special act or charter
provision, or action of the legislative body, such terms shall begin on the
first day of July following the municipal election at which such official
is elected, [and] (2) in each municipality which holds its municipal
election on the [Tuesday after the first Monday of] November date in
the odd-numbered years, or on the November date in the even-
numbered years, specified in section 9-164, as amended by this act, with
the exception of the term of the town clerk, in the absence of such special
act, or charter provision, or action of the legislative body, such term shall
begin on the second Tuesday next following the day of the municipal
election at which such official is elected, and (3) in each municipality
which holds its municipal election on the [Tuesday after the first
Monday in] November date in the odd-numbered years, or on the
November date in the even-numbered years, specified in section 9-164,
as amended by this act, the term of the town clerk shall be two years
from the first Monday of January next succeeding [his] such clerk's
election, unless otherwise provided by charter or special act. Whenever
the beginning date of the terms of elected municipal officials is so
sHB5544 / File No. 550 3

sHB5544 File No. 550
determined or changed, within the limits [hereinabove] specified in this
section, the authority providing [therefor] for such determination or
change may provide for the conforming diminution or extension of
terms of incumbents.
Sec. 4. Section 9-164b of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
As to any board or commission of a municipality with a rotating
membership, some of the members of which, prior to any change in a
municipal election date for such municipality under section 9-164, as
amended by this act, were elected for terms beginning approximately
one year after the date of [their] such members' election, the legislative
body of such municipality may provide for such conforming changes in
the beginning date of the terms of office as are designed to continue the
rotation with regard to such office as [it] such rotation existed prior to
such change, and in the absence of such action by such legislative body,
the beginning date of the terms of such office shall be so changed by the
clerk of the municipality in preparing the list provided for under section
9-254. With respect to any board or commission of a municipality with
a rotating membership established under sections 8-1, 8-4a, 8-5 and 8-
100 19, the authority empowered to prescribe the term of office of the
101 members of such board or commission, if it is authorized under [said]
102 sections 8-1, 8-4a, 8-5 and 8-19 to provide for an odd-numbered year
103 term, may further provide for deferred terms by prescribing which
104 terms are to begin approximately one year from the date on which the
105 terms of municipal officers generally begin in such municipality.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 9-164(a)
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 9-164c
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 9-187a
Sec. 4 January 1, 2027 9-164b
sHB5544 / File No. 550 4

sHB5544 File No. 550
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a)(1)(A)(ii), "by a majority vote" was added for clarity; and
in Section 1(a)(1)(B), "subparagraph (A)" was changed to "subparagraph
(A)(i)" for accuracy, and "or in conjunction with the state election on the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of the even-numbered
years" was added for internal consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5544 / File No. 550 5

sHB5544 File No. 550
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities Potential See Below See Below
Savings
Explanation
The bill allows municipalities to shift elections to coincide with
existing state and federal elections beginning in FY 27, resulting in
savings to municipalities that shift their elections. The exact savings will
depend on the number of municipalities that choose to shift their
municipal election dates and the amount those municipalities would
have otherwise spent on municipal elections. The timing of the savings
depends on when (if at all) a municipality adopts the shift.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of municipalities that
choose to shift the existing municipal election date.
sHB5544 / File No. 550 6

sHB5544 File No. 550
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5544
AN ACT ALLOWING MUNICIPALITIES TO HOLD MUNICIPAL
ELECTIONS IN CONJUNCTION WITH STATE ELECTIONS.